Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or increased fees, adopted by the State Board of  Chiropractic Examiners and
approved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) For chiropractic physician applicants and licensees:
(a) Initial application and background check fee: $495
(b) Initial application and background check fee for reciprocity candidates: $495
(c) Initial license fee: $234
(d) Active annual registration fee: $663
(e) Senior active annual registration fee: $491.40
(f) Inactive annual registration fee: $351
(g) Delinquent fee for late renewal: $150 per week
(2) For chiropractic assistant applicants and certificate holders:
(a) Initial application, certification and background check fee: $175
(b) Annual renewal fee: $117
(3) Criminal  background check fee for applicants, chiropractic physicians and
chiropractic assistants: $45
(4) For civil penalty citations, if issued:
(a) Failing to notify the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners within 30  days of changes
to email, business and mailing addresses: $50
(b) Failing to pay fines  or fees owed to the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners: $50
per month of nonpayment
(c) Failing to comply  with continuing education requirements for chiropractic assistants:
$15 per credit not completed
(d) Failing to notify the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners within 10 days that  a
licensee is convicted  of a misdemeanor or felony or arrested for a felony crime: $125 per
week
(e) Failing to notify the State  Board of Chiropractic Examiners of designated records
custodian: $500
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate May 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 2